Arkansas, session 2025, HB1692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-39-202(2)(A), concerning the
qualifications for a polygraph examiner license or an intern polygraph
examiner license applicant, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Has successfully completed a criminal background check and
has not been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to one (1)
or more of the following in any court in the State of Arkansas or a
comparable offense in another state or in a military or federal court, for
which a pardon has not been granted:
(i) Felony;
(ii) Class A misdemeanor; or
(iii) Crime involving violence; or
(iv) Crime involving moral turpitude.

*LGL085*
03/05/2025 5:08:41 AM LGL085

HB1692
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-39-206(b)(2)(A), concerning the
qualifications of an intern polygraph examiner license applicant, is amended
to read as follows:
(2)(A) Has successfully completed a criminal background check and
has not been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to one (1)
or more of the following in any court in the State of Arkansas or a
comparable offense in another state or in a military or federal court, for
which a pardon has not been granted:
(i) Felony;
(ii) Class A misdemeanor; or
(iii) Crime involving violence; or
(iv) Crime involving moral turpitude.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-39-211(10), concerning grounds for the
denial, suspension, or revocation of a polygraph examiner license or an
intern polygraph examiner license, is amended to read as follows:
(10) Arrest or indictment of an applicant or a licensee for a
felony, Class A misdemeanor, crime involving an act of violence, crime
involving moral turpitude, including a sealed and expunged offense, or an
offense of comparable level if the offense occurred in another state.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-39-304(5)(A), concerning application
requirements for a voice stress analysis examiner license, is amended to read
as follows:
(5)(A) Has successfully completed a state and national criminal
background check and has not been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo
contendere to one (1) or more of the following in any court in the State of
Arkansas or a comparable offense in another state or in a military or federal
court, for which a pardon has not been granted:
(i) Felony;
(ii) Class A misdemeanor; or
(iii) Crime involving violence; or
(iv) Crime involving moral turpitude.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-39-306(11), concerning grounds for the
denial, suspension, or revocation of a certified voice stress analysis
03/05/2025 5:08:41 AM LGL085

HB1692
examiner license, is amended to read as follows:
(11) Arrest or indictment of an applicant for licensure as a
certified voice stress analysis examiner or of a licensed certified voice
stress analysis examiner for a felony, Class A misdemeanor, crime involving
an act of violence, a crime involving moral turpitude, or an offense of
comparable level if the offense occurred in another state; or

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-40-103(a)(18)(C), concerning the
background check required for a technician installing an alarm device on
property owned or leased by a person monitoring the device, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(iii) The results of the state and national criminal
background check required under subdivision (a)(18)(C)(i) of this section
shall be subject to § 17-40-306(d).

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-40-208(e), concerning the training
requirements for a private security officer, a commissioned security officer,
and a commissioned school security officer, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) When an individual meets the training requirements approved by
the director, that individual shall not be required to be retrained until two
(2) years after the private security officer, commissioned security officer,
or commissioned school security officer is commissioned.
(2) Refresher training for a commissioned security officer and a
commissioned school security officer is required each year.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-40-307(a)(8), concerning the application
for a license or credential related to private investigators and private
security agencies, is amended to read as follows:
(8) A verified statement disclosing any record of arrests,
pending criminal charges, or convictions of the applicant of a felony, Class
A misdemeanor, or a crime involving an act of violence, or any crime
involving moral turpitude, including those that have been sealed or expunged;
and

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-40-339 is repealed.
17-40-339. Commission — Notice to law enforcement.
03/05/2025 5:08:41 AM LGL085

HB1692
(a) The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall notify
the sheriff of the county and the chief of police of the city, if applicable,
in which the applicant resides of the application for a commission to be a
commissioned security officer or a commissioned school security officer.
(b) A sheriff or chief of police who wishes to object to the issuance
of a commission as a commissioned security officer or a commissioned school
security officer to a particular applicant may do so by notifying the
director of his or her objection with specific reasons within thirty (30)
days after the date of receipt of notification under this section.
(c) If a sheriff or chief of police who is given notice under this
section files an objection and the director finds good cause to consider the
objection to have merit, the director may deny the application for the
commission.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-40-340 is amended to read as follows:
17-40-340. Commission — Issuance of identification card.
Each commission as a commissioned security officer or a commissioned
school security officer issued under this chapter shall be in the form of a
commission photo identification card designed or electronic identification
card determined by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police that
shall identify:
(1) The commission holder;
(2) The security department of a private business or school by
whom the commission holder is employed;
(3) A photograph of the credential holder; and
(4) A credential number and date of expiration.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-40-344 is amended to read as follows:
17-40-344. Commission — Denial, suspension, or revocation.
The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may deny,
suspend, or revoke a commission as a commissioned school security officer or
a commission as a commissioned security officer if the applicant for a
commission or the commission holder is indicted or arrested for one (1) of
the following offenses or a comparable offense in another state:
(1) A felony;
(2) A Class A misdemeanor;
03/05/2025 5:08:41 AM LGL085

HB1692
(3) A crime involving an act of violence;
(4) A crime involving the use of a firearm;
(5) A crime involving the use of alcohol or drugs while in
possession of a firearm; or
(6) A crime that results in the person's disqualifying himself or
herself from legally possessing a firearm under state or federal law; or
(7) A crime involving moral turpitude.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-40-350(c)(1), concerning grounds for
disciplinary action pertaining to licenses, credentials, or commissions
related to private investigators and private security agencies, is amended to
read as follows:
(c)(1) The director may suspend a license, credential, or commission
of a person who is found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a
felony, a Class A misdemeanor, or a crime involving an act of violence, or a
crime involving an act of moral turpitude in this state or a comparable
offense in another state or territory of the United States or in any foreign
country.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(40), concerning special revenues
of the state, is amended to read as follows:
(40) Private investigator's application fees, agency fees, and
license fees and security guard fines and fees, as enacted by Acts 1977, No.
429, known as the “Private Security Agency, Private Investigator, and School
Security Licensing and Credentialing Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto,
§§ 17-40-101 — 17-40-104, 17-40-204, 17-40-207 — 17-40-209, 17-40-301, 17-40-
302, 17-40-306 — 17-40-317, 17-40-329 — 17-40-332, 17-40-337, 17-40-339, 17-
40-340, 17-40-342 — 17-40-344, and 17-40-349 — 17-40-355;








03/05/2025 5:08:41 AM LGL085